Oklahoma, session 2026, SB621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-10-206 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any municipal waste combustor subject to oversight under 40
C.F.R., Part 60, Subpart Eb, and regulation by the Department of
Environmental Quality shall be exempt from any subsequent regulation
by the Department of Environmental Quality relating to general-
purpose waste incineration or incineration of specified waste
sources, including, but not limited to: biomedical waste; hospital,
medical, and infectious waste; commercial solid waste; and
industrial solid waste.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB621 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY
February 13, 2025 - DO PASS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB621 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)